District of Columbia statutes.
16-4601.08

Appearance and limited immunity.

(a)

A party to a child-custody proceeding, including a modification proceeding, or a petitioner or respondent in a proceeding to enforce or register a child-custody determination, is not subject to personal jurisdiction in the District for another proceeding or purpose solely by reason of having participated, or of having been physically present for the purpose of participating, in the proceeding.

(b)

A person who is subject to personal jurisdiction in the District on a basis other than physical presence is not immune from service of process in the District. A party present in the District who is subject to the jurisdiction of another state is not immune from service of process allowable under the laws of that state.

(c)

The immunity granted by subsection (a) of this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to the participation in a proceeding under this chapter committed by an individual while present in the District.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 109 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).